Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1716.01
Annexation; property contiguous to or abutting county road; effect.

Any city or village annexing property contiguous to or abutting upon any part of a county road shall be deemed to have annexed, without further action, all of the contiguous or abutting road at the time of such annexation, except that this section shall not apply to county roads separating counties.

Laws 1977, LB 173, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 631, § 1.